Utah statutes.
51-8-201.   General standard of care.
(1)  Subject to the intent of a donor expressed in a gift instrument, an
institution, in managing and investing an institutional fund, shall consider
the charitable purposes of the institution and the purposes of the
institutional fund.
(2)  In addition to complying with the duty of loyalty imposed by law other
than this chapter, each person responsible for managing and investing an
institutional fund shall manage and invest the fund in good faith and with the
care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under
similar circumstances.
